Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB929.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 17.500 TO 17.580 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Each registrant is required to pay a registration fee of:
1. One thousand dollars ($1,000) to the Department of Kentucky State
Police within five (5) days; and
2. For each subsequent year during the registrant's period of registration
under KRS 17.520, one hundred fifty dollars ($150) to the Department
of Kentucky State Police on or before the anniversary;
of his or her release by the court, the parole board, the cabinet, or any
detention facility.
(b) The fee shall be deposited by the department into the sex offender registry
fund established in subsection (3) of this section.
(c) A registrant shall not be prevented from registering or updating information
in accordance with KRS 17.510 because of failure to pay the annual
registration fee.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 534.040, any registrant who knowingly violates
subsection (1)(a) of this section is guilty of a violation with a fine of up to
five hundred dollars ($500).
(b) Any fines collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the
general fund.
(3) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency
account to be known as the sex offender registry fund. The fund shall
consist of moneys received under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall administer the fund.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used to maintain the sex offender
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/4/2026 2:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1269
registry in accordance with KRS 17.500 to 17.580.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.299, any money remaining in the fund at the close
of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/4/2026 2:21 PM Jacketed